Washington statutes.
RCW 18.350.050

Uniform disciplinary act—Application.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of certification, and the discipline of certified dental anesthesia assistants under this chapter.

[ 2012 c 23 s 5.]